Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2391.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 21-6309 is hereby amended to read as follows: 21-
6309. (a) It shall be unlawful to possess, with no requirement of a culpable
mental state, a firearm:
(1) Within any building located within the capitol complex;
(2) within the governor's residence;
(3) on the grounds of or in any building on the grounds of the
governor's residence;
(4) within any other state-owned or leased building if the secretary of
administration has so designated by rules and regulations and
conspicuously placed signs clearly stating that firearms are prohibited
within such building; or
(5) within any county courthouse, unless, by county resolution, the
board of county commissioners authorize the possession of a firearm
within such courthouse.
(b) Violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.
(c) This section shall not apply to:
(1) A commissioned law enforcement officer;
(2) a full-time salaried law enforcement officer of another state or the
federal government who is carrying out official duties while in this state;
(3) any person summoned by any such officer to assist in making
arrests or preserving the peace while actually engaged in assisting such
officer; or
(4) a member of the military of this state or the United States engaged
in the performance of duties.
(d) It is not a violation of this section for:
(1) The governor, the governor's immediate family, or specifically
authorized guest of the governor to possess a firearm within the governor's
residence or on the grounds of or in any building on the grounds of the
governor's residence;

HB 2391 2
(2) the United States attorney for the district of Kansas, the attorney
general, any district attorney or county attorney, any assistant United
States attorney if authorized by the United States attorney for the district
of Kansas, any assistant attorney general if authorized by the attorney
general, or any assistant district attorney or assistant county attorney if
authorized by the district attorney or county attorney by whom such
assistant is employed, to possess a firearm within any county courthouse
and court-related facility, subject to any restrictions or prohibitions
imposed in any courtroom by the chief judge of the judicial district;
(3) law enforcement officers, as that term is defined in K.S.A. 75-
7c22, and amendments thereto, who satisfy the requirements of either
K.S.A. 75-7c22(a) or (b), and amendments thereto, to possess a firearm; or
(4) an individual to possess a concealed handgun if such individual is
not prohibited from possessing a firearm under either federal or state law,
and such individual is either:
(A) Is 21 years of age or older; or
(B) possesses a valid provisional license issued pursuant to K.S.A.
75-7c03, and amendments thereto, or a valid license to carry a concealed
handgun issued by another jurisdiction that is recognized in this state
pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c03, and amendments thereto; or
(C) is not in possession of a concealed handgun in the state capitol in
violation of K.S.A. 75-7c21, and amendments thereto.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any county may
elect by passage of a resolution that the provisions of subsection (d)(2)
shall not apply to such county's courthouse or court-related facilities if
such:
(1) Buildings have adequate security measures to ensure that no
weapons are permitted to be carried into such buildings;
(2) county also has a policy or regulation requiring all law
enforcement officers to secure and store such officer's firearm upon
entering the courthouse or court-related facility. Such policy or regulation
may provide that it does not apply to court security or sheriff's office
personnel for such county; and
(3) buildings have a sign conspicuously posted at each entryway into
such building stating that the provisions of subsection (d)(2) do not apply
to such building.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) "Adequate security measures" shall have the same meaning as the
term is means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-7c20, and amendments
thereto;
(2) "possession" means having joint or exclusive control over a
firearm or having a firearm in a place where the person has some measure
of access and right of control; and

HB 2391 3
(3) "capitol complex" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-4514,
and amendments thereto.
(g) For the purposes of subsections (a)(1), (a)(4) and (a)(5),
"building" and "courthouse" shall not include any structure, or any area of
any structure, designated for the parking of motor vehicles.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7c21 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7c21. (a) An No individual may shall carry a concealed
handgun in the state capitol if such individual is not prohibited from
possessing a firearm under either federal or state law, and is either: (A) 21
years of age or older; or (B) possesses a valid provisional license issued
pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c03, and amendments thereto, or a valid license to
carry a concealed handgun issued by another jurisdiction that is recognized
in this state pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c03, and amendments thereto, except
that an individual may possess a handgun in a private means of
conveyance located in any structure connected to the state capitol, or any
area of such structure, designated for the parking of motor vehicles.
(b) This section shall not apply to:
(1) A commissioned law enforcement officer;
(2) a full-time salaried law enforcement officer of another state or the
federal government who is carrying out official duties while in this state;
(3) a law enforcement officer, as defined in K.S.A. 75-7c22, and
amendments thereto, who satisfies the requirements of either K.S.A.
757c22(a) or (b), and amendments thereto;
(4) any person summoned by any such officer to assist in making
arrests or preserving the peace while actually engaged in assisting such
officer; or
(5) a member of the military of this state or the United States
engaged in the performance of duties.
(c) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the personal
and family protection act.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 21-6309 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7c21 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.